Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 9
TURNING - STOPPING

Cross references:

For penalties for class A traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-901. Required position and method of turning.

The driver of a motor vehicle intending to turn shall do so as follows:

Right turns. Both the approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

Left turns. The driver of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of such vehicle. Whenever practicable, the left turn shall be made to the left of the center of the intersection so as to leave the intersection or other location in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the same direction as such vehicle on the roadway being entered.

Two-way left-turn lanes. Where a special lane for making left turns by drivers proceeding in opposite directions has been indicated by official traffic control devices in the manner prescribed in the state traffic control manual, a left turn shall not be made from any other lane, and a vehicle shall not be driven in said special lane except when preparing for or making a left turn from or into the roadway or when preparing for or making a U-turn when otherwise permitted by law.

The department of transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause official traffic control devices to be placed and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by turning vehicles, and, when such devices are so placed, no driver shall turn a vehicle other than as directed and required by such devices. In the case of streets which are a part of the state highway system, the local regulation shall be subject to the approval of the department of transportation as provided in section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2356, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-801 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-901 was relocated to § 42-4-1001.

42-4-902. Limitations on turning around.

No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade where such vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within such distance as is necessary to avoid interfering with or endangering approaching traffic.

The driver of any vehicle shall not turn such vehicle at an intersection or any other location so as to proceed in the opposite direction unless such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with or endangering other traffic.

Local and state authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, subject to the provisions of section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S., in the case of streets which are state highways, may erect "U-turn" prohibition or restriction signs at intersections or other locations where such movements are deemed to be hazardous, and, whenever official signs are so erected, no driver of a vehicle shall disobey the instructions thereof.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2356, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-802 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-902 was relocated to § 42-4-1002.

42-4-903. Turning movements and required signals.

No person shall turn a vehicle at an intersection unless the vehicle is in proper position upon the roadway as required in section 42-4-901, or turn a vehicle to enter a private road or driveway, or otherwise turn a vehicle from a direct course or move right or left upon a roadway unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety and then only after giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in sections 42-4-608 and 42-4-609.

A signal of intention to turn right or left shall be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred feet traveled by the vehicle before turning in urban or metropolitan areas and shall be given continuously for at least two hundred feet on all four-lane highways and other highways where the prima facie or posted speed limit is more than forty miles per hour. Such signals shall be given regardless of existing weather conditions.

No person shall stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided in sections 42-4-608 and 42-4-609 to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give such signal.

The signals provided for in section 42-4-608 (2) shall be used to indicate an intention to turn, change lanes, or start from a parked position and shall not be flashed on one side only on a parked or disabled vehicle or flashed as a courtesy or "do pass" signal to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2357, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-803 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-903 was relocated to § 42-4-1003.